src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Pronouns 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PronRoot 

ez+Prn+Pers+P1+Sg+Nom:ez # ;
ez+Prn+Pers+P1+Sg+Obl:min # ;
tu+Prn+Pers+P2+Sg+Nom:tu # ;
tu+Prn+Pers+P2+Sg+Obl:te # ;

em+Prn+Pers+P1+Pl+Nom:em # ;
em+Prn+Pers+P1+Pl+Obl:me # ;
hun+Prn+Pers+P2+Pl+Nom:hun # ;
hun+Prn+Pers+P2+Pl+Obl:we # ;

ew+Prn+Dem+Sg+Nom:ew # ;
ew+Prn+Dem+Masc+Sg+Obl:wî # ;
ew+Prn+Dem+Fem+Sg+Obl:wê # ;
ew+Prn+Dem+Pl+Nom:ew # ;
ew+Prn+Dem+Pl+Obl:wan # ;

ev+Prn+Dem+Sg+Nom:ev # ;
ev+Prn+Dem+Masc+Sg+Obl:vî # ;
ev+Prn+Dem+Fem+Sg+Obl:vê # ;
ev+Prn+Dem+Pl+Nom:ev # ;
ev+Prn+Dem+Pl+Obl:van # ;
